Nebraska, session 109, LB14.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB14 LB14
2025 2025
Section 1. Sections 1 to 7 of this act shall be known and may be
cited as the Hunger-Free Schools Act.
Sec. 2. Section 79-10,137, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-10,137 The Legislature finds that, for Nebraska to compete
effectively in the world, it must have an educated and productive work
force. In order to have an educated and productive work force, it must
prepare its children to learn, and in order to do so the children must be
well-nourished. The Legislature further finds that school breakfast and
lunch programs are integral parts of Nebraska's educational system and
that every student deserves access to healthy food during the school day.
It is the intent of the Legislature to provide each student with the best
opportunity for educational success by ensuring that public schools offer
meals during the school day at no cost to every student.
Sec. 3. For purposes of the Hunger-Free Schools Act:
(1) Community eligibility provision has the same meaning as in
section 79-101;
(2) Department means the State Department of Education;
(3) Eligible breakfast means a school breakfast served to a student
that is reimbursable, in total or in part, with federal funds as
specified under regulations promulgated by the United States Department
of Agriculture pursuant to the federal Child Nutrition Act of 1966, 42
U.S.C. 1771 et seq., as such act and regulations existed on January 1,
2023;
(4) Eligible lunch means a school lunch served to a student that is
reimbursable, in total or in part, with federal funds as specified under
regulations promulgated by the United States Department of Agriculture
pursuant to the federal Richard B. Russell National School Lunch Act, 42
U.S.C. 1751 et seq., as such act and regulations existed on January 1,
2023;
(5) Federal reimbursement rate means the payment levels received by
-2-

LB14 LB14
2025 2025
the qualified school for an eligible breakfast or an eligible lunch for
the school year in which the eligible breakfast or the eligible lunch was
served, as published by the United States Department of Agriculture
pursuant to the federal Child Nutrition Act of 1966, 42 U.S.C. 1771 et
seq., and the federal Richard B. Russell National School Lunch Act, 42
U.S.C. 1751 et seq., and regulations promulgated under such acts, as such
acts and regulations existed on January 1, 2023;
(6) Fully paid breakfast means an eligible breakfast served to a
student who is not eligible for free or reduced-price school meals;
(7) Fully paid lunch means an eligible lunch served to a student who
is not eligible for free or reduced-price school meals;
(8) Identified student percentage means the identified student
percentage calculated for high-poverty schools as specified under
regulations promulgated by the United States Department of Agriculture
pursuant to the federal Richard B. Russell National School Lunch Act, 42
U.S.C. 1751 et seq., as such act and regulations existed on January 1,
2023;
(9) Qualified school means a public school or a nonprofit private
school which is participating in the school breakfast program or the
national school lunch program under the federal Child Nutrition Act of
1966, 42 U.S.C. 1771 et seq., or the federal Richard B. Russell National
School Lunch Act, 42 U.S.C. 1751 et seq., as such acts existed on January
1, 2023;
(10) Reduced-price breakfast means a breakfast served to an eligible
student by a public school or nonprofit private school participating in
the school breakfast program under the federal Child Nutrition Act of
1966, 42 U.S.C. 1771 et seq., as such act existed on January 1, 2023; and
(11) Reduced-price lunch means a lunch served to an eligible student
by a public school or nonprofit private school participating in the
national school lunch program under the federal Richard B. Russell
National School Lunch Act, 42 U.S.C. 1751 et seq., as such act existed on
-3-

LB14 LB14
2025 2025
January 1, 2023.
Sec. 4. The Hunger-Free Schools Program is created. To comply with
the Hunger-Free Schools Program, a qualified school shall:
(1) Offer eligible breakfasts and eligible lunches at no cost to all
students for any school breakfast program or school lunch program
operated by such school during the school day;
(2) Submit information regarding the number of eligible breakfasts
and eligible lunches served in a manner prescribed by the department; and
(3) Maximize federal reimbursement for eligible breakfasts and
eligible lunches by operating under the community eligibility provision
if such school has an identified student percentage greater than or equal
to sixty-two and one-half percent.
Sec. 5. The department shall reimburse each qualified school a
portion of the cost of each eligible breakfast and each eligible lunch
served by such school during the second preceding school fiscal year in
an amount intended to offset the cost of providing such eligible
breakfasts and eligible lunches at no cost to all students. The
department shall make disbursements annually to each qualified school
that complies with the requirements of the Hunger-Free Schools Program in
the amount of:
(1) For each qualified school that has adopted the community
eligibility provision for the school fiscal year during which such
eligible breakfasts and eligible lunches were served:
(a) The difference between the federal reimbursement rate for a free
breakfast and the federal reimbursement rate for a fully paid breakfast
for each fully paid breakfast served; and
(b) The difference between the federal reimbursement rate for a free
lunch and the federal reimbursement rate for a fully paid lunch for each
fully paid lunch served; and
(2) For each qualified school that has not adopted the community
eligibility provision in the school fiscal year during which the eligible
-4-

LB14 LB14
2025 2025
breakfasts and eligible lunches were served:
(a) Thirty cents for each eligible breakfast served to a student
eligible for a reduced-price breakfast;
(b) Forty cents for each eligible lunch served to a student eligible
for a reduced-price lunch;
(c) The difference between the federal reimbursement rate for a free
breakfast and the federal reimbursement rate for a fully paid breakfast
for each fully paid breakfast served; and
(d) The difference between the federal reimbursement rate for a free
lunch and the federal reimbursement rate for a fully paid lunch for each
fully paid lunch served.
Sec. 6. (1) Nothing in the Hunger-Free Schools Act shall prevent a
school district or a nonprofit private school from collecting information
from the parent or guardian of a student to determine eligibility for
other services of the school district or nonprofit private school.
(2) The State Board of Education may adopt and promulgate rules and
regulations to carry out the act.
(3) It is the intent of the Legislature to appropriate money from
the General Fund to carry out the Hunger-Free Schools Act.
Sec. 7. Original section 79-10,137, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
Sec. 8. The following sections are outright repealed: Sections
79-10,138 and 79-10,139, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska.
-5-